Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.090

Jurisdiction over adjacent waters—Control of street over tidelands.

The legislative body of a code city shall have supervision and control within its corporate limits of streets over tidelands or upon or across tide and shore lands of the first class as provided in RCW 35.21.230, 35.21.240 and 35.21.250; and shall have jurisdiction over adjacent waters as provided in RCW 35.21.160.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.21.090.]